Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,113
Apprentice salon; license; requirements.

In order to be licensed as an apprentice salon by the department, an applicant shall meet and present to the department evidence of meeting the following requirements:

(1) The proposed apprentice salon shall hold a current active license as a cosmetology salon or esthetics salon;

(2) The proposed apprentice salon shall employ or plan to employ one active instructor for each two apprentices or fraction thereof it enrolls; and

(3) The proposed apprentice salon shall provide an area of not less than one hundred square feet to be used solely for educational purposes.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 112;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 43;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,151;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 375.